Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB1896.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 318(f) of the act of February 9, 1999 (P.L.1, No.1), known as the Capital Facilities Debt Enabling Act, is amended and the section is amended by adding a subsection to read:Section 318. Administration of redevelopment assistance capital projects.* * *(f) Bids.--Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the solicitation of a minimum of three written bids for all contracted construction work on redevelopment assistance capital projects shall be the sole requirement for the composition, solicitation, opening and award of bids on such projects[.] 1234567891011121314151617181920 where total construction costs are less than $25,000. For projects where total construction costs exceed $25,000, the solicitation of bids shall include that workers must be paid at least the prevailing minimum wage rates as determined by the Secretary of Labor and Industry under the act of August 15, 1961 (P.L.987, No.442), known as the Pennsylvania Prevailing Wage Act. Notwithstanding the foregoing, the construction work shall be performed subject to the act of March 3, 1978 (P.L.6, No.3), known as the Steel Products Procurement Act.(f.1) Application of Pennsylvania Prevailing Wage Act.--A redevelopment assistance capital project shall be considered a public work and subject to the Pennsylvania Prevailing Wage Act, in its entirety, regardless of the utilization of separate contracts or phases, if the work to be performed on the project is consecutive or contained within the same project site or structure.* * *Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB1896PN2319 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718